California statutes. Education Code
(3) Audiometrists who hold a certificate of registration issued by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(d) “Creditable service” also means the performance of California public school activities related to, and an outgrowth of, the instructional and guidance program of the California public school when performed for the same employer for which the member is performing any of the activities described in subdivision (b) or (c).

(e) “Creditable service” also means trustee service as defined in Section 26144.5, if
 eligible pursuant to Section 26403. 

(f) The board shall have final authority for determining creditable service to cover activities not already specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26114.

“Death benefit” means the benefit payable under this part upon the death of the participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26115.

“Defined Benefit Program” means the Defined Benefit Program of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan as set forth in Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26116.

“Disability benefit” means an amount payable under this part for permanent and total disability that is equal to the sum of the participant’s employee account and employer account as of the disability date and is payable pursuant to Section 26905, 26906, or 26906.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

26117.

“Disability date” means the date the benefit becomes payable to a participant who has applied for a disability benefit from the plan under this part and has been determined to have a total and permanent disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 233.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26118.

“Employee” means a person engaged to perform creditable service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26119.

“Employee account” means the nominal account of the participant to which employee contributions and interest and any additional earnings credits in respect thereof are credited under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 234.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26120.

“Employee contribution rate” means the percentage of the participant’s salary withheld by the employer as an employee contribution under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 235.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26121.

“Employee contribution” means the amount withheld from the participant’s salary by the employer as a contribution by the employee under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 236.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26122.

(a) “Employer” means a school district, community college district, or county office of education that has elected to provide the benefits of this part to persons employed to perform creditable service. “Employer” shall not include the state.

(b) The board shall have final authority for determining an “employer” for purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 239, Sec. 9.   (SB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26123.

“Employer account” means the nominal account of the participant in which employer contributions on behalf of the participant and interest and any additional earnings credits in respect thereof are credited under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 237.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26124.

“Employer contribution rate” means the percentage of salary that determines the amount the employer contributes to the Cash Balance Benefit Program with respect to each employee who is a participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 238.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26125.

“Employer contribution” means the amount contributed by the employer to the Cash Balance Benefit Program with respect to the participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 239.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26126.

“Employed” or “employment” means employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 240.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26127.

“Full time equivalent” means the days or hours of creditable service that a person who is employed on a part-time basis would be required to perform in a school term if he or she were employed full time, as defined by Section 22138.5, in that position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 27.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

26128.

“Fund” means the Teachers’ Retirement Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26129.

“Gain and Loss Reserve” means the reserve account established by the board within the fund with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program to be drawn upon to the extent necessary to credit interest to employee accounts and employer accounts at the minimum interest rate during years in which the plan’s investment earnings with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program are not sufficient for that purpose, and where necessary, to provide additions to the Annuitant Reserve for monthly annuity payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26130.

“Investment earnings” means income received or receivable during the plan year by the plan from investment of employee contributions, employer contributions, and prior investment earnings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26131.

“Minimum interest rate” means the annual rate determined for the plan year by the board by means of an amendment to the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program in accordance with applicable federal laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 242.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26132.

“Participant” means a person who has performed creditable service subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program and who has contributions credited under the Cash Balance Benefit Program or is receiving an annuity under the Cash Balance Benefit Program by reason of creditable service or has not yet met the conditions of subdivision (b) of Section 26806.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 29.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26132.5.

(a) “Participant subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013” means, notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 7522.04 of the Government Code, a person who first becomes employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Cash Balance Benefit Program on or after January 1, 2013.

(b) A participant as defined in subdivision (a) does not include a person who was a member on or before December 31, 2012, of the California Public Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislators’ Retirement System, the University of California Retirement System, county retirement systems established under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31450) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 3 of
 the Government Code, or the San Francisco Employees’ Retirement System, and the person performed service in the other retirement system within the six months prior to the commencement of creditable service under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(c) This section shall be deemed to have become operative on January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 33.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

26133.

“Pay period” means a payroll period specified by the employer but not more than 31 calendar days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 244.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26134.

“Plan” means the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26135.

“Plan year” means the calendar, policy, or fiscal year on which the records of the plan are kept, with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program. The board by means of plan amendment shall determine the plan year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

26135.5.

“Public employer” means a public employer as defined by subdivision (i) of Section 7522.04 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

26135.7.

(a) “Retired participant activities” means one or more activities identified in subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 22119.5 or (b), (c), or (d) of Section 26113 within the California public school system and performed by a participant retired for service under this part as one of the following:

(1) An employee of an employer.

(2) An employee of a third party, except as specified in subdivision (b).

(3) An independent contractor.

(b) The activities of an employee of a third party shall not be included
 in the definition of “retired participant activities” if all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The employee performs an assignment of 24 months or less.

(2) The third-party employer does not participate in a California public pension system.

(3) The activities performed by the individual are not normally performed by employees of an employer, as defined in Section 22131.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 782, Sec. 11.   (AB 963)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26136.

“Retirement” means termination of employment and completion of all conditions precedent to receiving a retirement benefit under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 245.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26137.

“Retirement benefit” means an amount payable under this part in the event of the participant’s retirement for service that is equal to the sum of the participant’s employee account and employer account as of the retirement date and that is payable pursuant to Section 26806, 26807, or 26807.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

26138.

“Retirement date” means the date the benefit under this part becomes payable to a participant who has applied for a retirement benefit from the plan under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 246.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26139.

(a) “Salary” means remuneration paid in cash by an employer to a participant for creditable service performed in that position subject to coverage under the Cash Balance Benefit Program. Salary shall include:

(1) Money paid in accordance with a publicly available written contractual agreement, including, but not limited to, a salary schedule, based on years of training and years of experience as specified in Section 45028 for creditable service performed.

(2) For participants not paid according to a salary schedule, money paid for creditable service performed in accordance with a publicly available written contractual
 agreement, including, but not limited to, a collective bargaining agreement or an employment agreement.

(3) Money paid for the participant’s absence from performance of creditable service as approved by an employer, except as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(4) Employee contributions picked up by an employer pursuant to Section 26502.

(5) Amounts deducted by an employer from the participant’s salary, including, but not limited to, deductions for participation in a deferred compensation plan; deductions for the purchase of an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement plan, or other insurance program; and deductions for participation in a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(6) Money paid by an employer in addition to salary paid under paragraph (1) or (2) if paid to all employees in a class in the same dollar amount, the same percentage of salary, or the same percentage of the amount being distributed.

(7) Any other payments the board determines by plan amendment to be “salary.”

(b) “Salary” does not mean and shall not include:

(1) Money paid for service that is not creditable service.

(2) Money paid by an employer in addition to salary paid under paragraph (1) or (2) if not paid to all employees in a class in the same dollar amount, the same percentage of salary, or the same percentage of the amount being distributed.

(3) Fringe benefits provided by an employer.

(4) Expenses paid or reimbursed by an employer.

(5) Money paid in exchange for the relinquishment of unused accumulated leave.

(6) Severance pay, including lump-sum and installment payments, or money paid in excess of salary or wages to a participant as compensatory damages or as a compromise settlement.

(7) Payments, including, but not limited to, those for participation in a deferred compensation plan; to purchase an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement program, or other insurance program; and for participation in a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code
 that are purchased by an employer for a participant.

(8) Any payments determined by the system to have been made by an employer to enhance a participant’s benefits.

(9) Any other payments the board determines by plan amendment not to be “salary.”

(c) Any employer or person who knowingly or willfully reports salary in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of subdivisions (a) or (b) may be subject to prosecution for fraud, theft, or embezzlement in accordance with provisions of the Penal Code. The system may establish procedures to ensure that salary reported by an employer is in compliance with this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, remuneration shall be considered paid if distributed to any person in the same class of employees who meets
 the qualifications or requirements specified in a publicly available written contractual agreement, including, but not limited to, a collective bargaining agreement or an employment agreement, as a condition of receiving the remuneration.

(e) This section shall be deemed to have become operative on July 1, 1996.

(f) This section shall not apply to a participant subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 36.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

26139.5.

(a) “Salary,” for participants subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013, means remuneration paid each pay period in cash by an employer to a participant for creditable service performed in that position subject to coverage under the Cash Balance Benefit Program in accordance with a publicly available written contractual agreement, including, but not limited to, a salary schedule or employment agreement, based on years of training and years of experience as specified in Section 45028. Salary shall include:

(1) Money paid for the participant’s absence from performance of creditable service as approved by an employer, except as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(2) Employee contributions picked up by an employer pursuant to Section 26502.

(3) Amounts deducted by an employer from the participant’s salary, including, but not limited to, deductions for participation in a deferred compensation plan; deductions for the purchase of an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement plan, or other insurance program; and deductions for participation in a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(4) Any other payments the board determines by plan amendment to be “salary.”

(b) “Salary” does not mean and shall not include:

(1) Money paid for service that is not creditable service.

(2) Money not paid each pay period in which creditable service is performed for that position.

(3) Fringe benefits provided by an employer.

(4) Expenses paid or reimbursed by an employer.

(5) Money paid in exchange for the relinquishment of unused accumulated leave.

(6) Severance pay, including lump-sum and installment payments, or money paid in excess of salary to a participant as compensatory damages or as a compromise settlement.

(7) Payments, including, but not limited to, those for participation in a deferred compensation plan; to purchase an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement program, or other insurance program; and
 for participation in a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code that are purchased by an employer for a participant.

(8) Any payments determined by the system to have been made by an employer to enhance a participant’s benefits under the plan.

(9) Money paid to the participant in lieu of benefits provided to the participant by the employer or paid directly by the employer to a third party other than the system for the benefit of the participant.

(10) Any one-time or ad hoc payments made to a participant.

(11) Any employer-provided allowance, reimbursement, or payment, including, but not limited to, one made for housing, vehicle, or uniform.

(12) Any bonus paid in addition to compensation described in subdivision (a).

(13) Any other payments the board determines by plan amendment not to be “salary.”

(c) (1) Salary in any fiscal year shall not exceed:

(A) One hundred twenty percent of the “contribution and benefit base,” as determined under Section 430(b) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 430(b)), on January 1, 2013, for a participant whose service is not included in the federal system.

(B) One hundred percent of the “contribution and benefit base,” as determined under Section 430(b) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 430(b)), on January 1, 2013, for a participant whose service is included
 in the federal system pursuant to any changes in state or federal law enacted on or after January 1, 2013.

(2) The system shall adjust the limit based on the annual changes to the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average, calculated by dividing the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average for the month of February in the fiscal year preceding the adjustment by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average for the month of February of the previous year rounded to the nearest thousandth. Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 7522.10 of the Government Code, the adjustment shall be effective annually on July 1, beginning July 1, 2014.

(3) The Legislature reserves the right to modify the
 requirements of this subdivision with regard to all participants subject to this subdivision, except that the Legislature may not modify these provisions in a manner that would result in a decrease in benefits accrued prior to the effective date of the modification.

(d) Any employer or person who knowingly or willfully reports salary in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of subdivisions (a) or (b) may be subject to prosecution for fraud, theft, or embezzlement in accordance with provisions of the Penal Code. The system may establish procedures to ensure that salary reported by an employer is in compliance with this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, remuneration shall be considered paid if distributed to any person in the same class of employees who meets the qualifications or requirements specified in a publicly available written contractual agreement, including,
 but not limited to, a collective bargaining agreement or an employment agreement, as a condition of receiving the remuneration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 30.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26140.

(a) “Spouse” means the person married to the participant on the date the participant files a beneficiary designation, or an application for a benefit, or on the date of the participant’s death.

(b) Except as excluded in Sections 26004 and 27406, a person who is the registered domestic partner of the participant, as established pursuant to Section 297 or 299.2 of the Family Code, on the date the participant files a beneficiary designation or an application for a benefit, or on the date of the participant’s death, shall be treated in the same manner as a spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

26142.

“System” means the State Teachers’ Retirement System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26142.5.

“System’s headquarters office” means the office building established as the permanent headquarters facility for the system, pursuant to Section 22375.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 31.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26143.

“Termination benefit” means a benefit that is an amount equal to the sum of the participant’s employee account and employer account payable under this part pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 27200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 248.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26144.

“Total and permanent disability” means any medically determinable physical or mental incapacity that is expected to prevent the participant from performing creditable service under this part for the employer for a continuous period of at least one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 249.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26144.5.

“Trustee service” means duties performed by a member of the governing body of an employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1020, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

26145.

“Unfunded actuarial obligation” means any negative balance in the Gain and Loss Reserve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Plan Administration [26200. - 26216.]

26200.

Employee contributions, employer contributions, investment earnings, and any other amounts provided under this part shall be deposited into the Teachers’ Retirement Fund. Disbursement of money from the fund shall be made upon claims made pursuant to Section 26209 and duly audited in the manner prescribed for the disbursement of other public funds. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Teachers’ Retirement Fund is continuously appropriated for the payment of benefits and investment transactions pursuant to this part. Disbursements may be made to return funds deposited in the fund in error.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26201.

Investment earnings shall be collected by the Treasurer, and together with any other moneys received in connection with the Cash Balance Benefit Program, shall be immediately deposited to the credit of the Teachers’ Retirement Fund and reported to the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26202.

(a) The board shall establish a Gain and Loss Reserve within the Teachers’ Retirement Fund for the Cash Balance Benefit Program. The board has sole authority to administer the Gain and Loss Reserve to be drawn upon to the extent necessary to credit interest to employee accounts and employer accounts at the minimum interest rate during years in which the investment earnings of the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program are not sufficient for that purpose, and, where necessary, to provide additions to the Annuitant Reserve for monthly annuity payments.

(b) The board shall establish and periodically review goals regarding the sufficiency of the Gain and Loss Reserve based
 on the recommendation of the actuary.

(c) In the event that the total amount of investment earnings of the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program for any plan year exceeds the sum of the total amount required to credit all employee and employer accounts at the minimum interest rate for the plan year plus the administrative costs of the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program for the plan year, the board shall determine the amount, if any, that is to be credited to the Gain and Loss Reserve for the plan year. That determination shall be made upon recommendation of the actuary based on the actuarial valuation undertaken following the plan year pursuant to Section 26211 but no later than June 30 following the end of the plan year. In determining whether an amount is to be credited to the Gain and Loss Reserve, the board shall consider the sufficiency of the reserve in light of the goal established for the sufficiency
 and the recommendations of the actuary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 40.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26203.

The board may amortize any unfunded actuarial obligation in accordance with standards established by the Actuarial Standards Board and Governmental Accounting Standards Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26204.

The board shall establish an Annuitant Reserve within the Teachers’ Retirement Fund for the Cash Balance Benefit Program. The board has sole authority to administer the Annuitant Reserve for the payment of annuities. The board may transfer the credits from a participant’s employee account and employer account to the Annuitant Reserve upon election of an annuity by the participant or beneficiary of the participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26205.

The board may transfer amounts between the Gain and Loss Reserve and the Annuitant Reserve upon the recommendation of the actuary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26206.

All administrative costs of the board and system for the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program shall be paid from the Teachers’ Retirement Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26207.5.

In no event shall the funding of the Cash Balance Benefit Program be a liability of the state or the General Fund, nor shall the General Fund be used to offset or fund any liabilities attributed to the operation of the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26208.

The board shall establish and maintain records and accounts following recognized accounting principles and controls with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 250.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26209.

The board may authorize the transfer and disbursement of funds from the Teachers’ Retirement Fund for the purpose of carrying into effect the Cash Balance Benefit Program upon the signature of its chairperson, vice chairperson, the chief executive officer, or any employee of the system designated by the chief executive officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26210.

The board has exclusive control of the investment of the Retirement Fund with respect to assets attributed to the Cash Balance Benefit Program. In investing the fund, the board and its officers and employees shall exercise their fiduciary duties set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22250) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 22350) of Part 13.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 251.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26211.

The board shall acquire the services of an actuary to:

(a) Perform an actuarial investigation of the demographic and economic experience of the Cash Balance Benefit Program at least once every four years and make recommendations to the board for the adoption of actuarial assumptions for the program that are, in the aggregate, reasonably related to the past experience of the program and the actuary’s best estimate of the future experience of the program.

(b) Perform an annual actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program, using the actuarial assumptions adopted by the board.

(c) Recommend to the board all rates and factors necessary to administer the Cash Balance Benefit Program, including, but not limited to, mortality tables, annuity factors, interest rates, additional earnings credits, and employer contribution rates.

(d) Recommend to the board the goal for maintaining a sufficient Gain and Loss Reserve with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program, the amount to be transferred to the Gain and Loss Reserve from investment earnings of the plan each year with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program, and a strategy for the amortization of any unfunded actuarial obligation.

(e) Recommend to the board transfers of amounts between the Gain and Loss Reserve and the Annuitant Reserve with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(f) Perform any other actuarial services that may be required for the administration of the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program, as requested by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 252.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26212.

The board shall maintain all data necessary for the actuarial investigation of the demographic and economic experience of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, and for the actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 253.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26213.

The board shall adopt actuarial assumptions, rates, factors and tables necessary to administer the Cash Balance Benefit Program as an amendment to the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 254.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26214.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the system shall make available, after the end of the plan year, to each participant having a balance in his or her employee account or employer account, a statement setting forth the balance as of the close of the plan year and amounts credited for the
 year. The system shall mail a copy of the participant’s statement, provided that the employer or participant has informed the system of the participant’s current mailing address and the participant has not requested to receive that statement
 electronically, in lieu of mailing.

(b) The mode of issuance described in subdivision (a) is subject to Section 22337.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 459, Sec. 10.   (AB 989)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

26216.

The board may administer the Cash Balance Benefit Program through an agreement with a qualified third-party administrator that shall provide custodial, recordkeeping, or other administrative services specified under the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 255.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Employer and Participant Responsibilities [26300. - 26306.]

26300.

(a) Within 10 working days following the later of the first day of employment, the date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program, or the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program, the employer shall make available to the employee the following information:

(1) The employee’s rights and responsibilities as a participant in the program, the employer’s responsibilities under the program, and the benefits payable under the program.

(2) The employee’s right to elect membership in the Defined Benefit Program in lieu of participation in the Cash Balance Benefit Program, the rights and responsibilities of a member and the employer under the Defined Benefit Program, and benefits payable under the Defined Benefit Program.

(b) Written acknowledgment by the employee that he or she has received the information specified in subdivision (a) shall be retained in the employer’s files on a form prescribed by the system.

(c) If an employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program gives employees the right to elect other coverage in lieu of the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to Section 26400, the employer shall, within 10 working days following the later of the first day on which creditable service is performed, the date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the program or the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the program, notify existing employees of the following:

(1) The employee’s right to elect other coverage if offered by the employer in lieu of participation in the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(2) The rights and responsibilities of the employer and a participant in an alternative retirement plan if offered by the employer.

(3) The benefits payable under an alternative retirement plan if offered by the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26301.

(a) Employers shall report contributions paid on behalf of each participant in each pay period, along with all other information required by the system no later than 10 working days following the last day of the pay period in which the salary was earned, and the report shall be delinquent immediately thereafter. That report shall be submitted electronically in an encrypted format provided by the system that ensures the security of the transmitted participant data.

(b) The board shall, in accordance with regulations, assess a penalty against the employer for a report submitted late or in an unacceptable form. The penalty shall be based upon the sum of the employee and employer contributions required to be reported under this
 part at a rate of interest equal to the regular interest rate, accruing on the balance for the period between the time the report was due and the time an acceptable report is actually received by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 703, Sec. 32.   (SB 349)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26301.5.

Each employer shall deduct from the salary of participants employed by the employer the participant contributions required by this part and shall remit to the system those contributions plus the employer contributions required by this part and Section 44987.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 257.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26301.7.

(a) All contributions due to the system by an employer under this part shall be paid by an electronic funds transfer method through an automated clearinghouse as prescribed by the board. This payment requirement is effective upon authorization by the board.

(b) For purposes of this section, “automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts. 

(c) An employer that is unable, for good
 cause, to comply with subdivision (a) may apply to the board for a waiver that allows the employer to pay in an alternate manner as prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.   (AB 2052)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

26302.

(a) If more or less than the contributions required by this part are paid to the plan based on salary paid to a participant, proper adjustment shall be made by the employer within 60 days of discovery or of notification by the system, and any contributions deducted in error from the participant’s salary shall be returned to the participant by the employer within the same time period.

(b) The board shall, in accordance with regulations, assess penalties for late or improper adjustments pursuant to Section 26301. These penalties shall be assessed at a rate equal to the penalties imposed under subdivision (b) of Section 26301 and shall be deemed to be interest earned in the year in which the penalty is
 received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 703, Sec. 33.   (SB 349)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26303.

(a) Employers shall transmit to the plan the employee contributions and employer contributions with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program for salary paid to each participant during the pay period no later than 10 working days following the last day of the pay period in which the salary was earned.

(b) Payments shall be delinquent on the 11th working day thereafter, and interest shall begin to accrue at the regular interest rate from that day until payment for the contributions and interest is received in full by the system. The board, in accordance with regulations, shall collect interest for late payment from the employer under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 703, Sec. 34.   (SB 349)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26303.5.
